Washington statutes.
RCW 18.22.015

Board—Duties—Rules.

The board shall:

(1) Administer all laws placed under its jurisdiction;

(2) Prepare, grade, and administer or determine the nature, grading, and administration of examinations for applicants for podiatric physician and surgeon licenses;

(3) Examine and investigate all applicants for podiatric physician and surgeon licenses and certify to the secretary all applicants it judges to be properly qualified;

(4) Adopt any rules which it considers necessary or proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(5) Adopt rules governing the administration of sedation and anesthesia in the offices of persons licensed under this chapter, including necessary training and equipment;

(6) Determine which schools of podiatric medicine and surgery will be approved.

[ 2007 c 273 s 28; 1990 c 147 s 5; 1986 c 259 s 18; 1982 c 21 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Implementation—2007 c 273: See RCW 70.230.900 and 70.230.901.

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.

Director of licensing or director's designee ex officio member of health professional licensure and disciplinary boards: RCW 43.70.300.